California, session 20252026, AB1814.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13519.16 is added to the Penal Code, to read:13519.16.(a)The commission shall establish and maintain a continuing training course that includes instructor-led active learning, such as scenario-based training, relating to law enforcement detection and apprehension of drivers whose behavior indicates that they may be driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol in violation of Section 23152 of the Vehicle Code.(b)This course shall be at least three consecutive hours, may include training scenarios and facilitated learning activities, and shall, at a minimum, include all of the following topics:(1)Standardized field sobriety testing.(2)The seven major drug categories.(3)Signs and symptomatology.(4)Physiology of drugs.(5)Drug combinations.(6)Courtroom testimony.(7)Report writing.(c)Except as described in subdivision (d), each13519.16. (a) A peace officer with a rank of supervisor or below who is assigned primarily to traffic enforcement shall complete the course described in subdivision (a) within one year of their assignment to traffic enforcement, and every two years thereafter for as long as they are assigned a National Highway Transportation Safety Administration-approved standard field sobriety testing course of a minimum of 16 hours within one year of their assignment to traffic enforcement. “Assigned to traffic enforcement” does not include an officer who enforces traffic laws as an ancillary function of a general patrol assignment.(d)Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a peace officer may complete either of the following in lieu of the course described in subdivision (a):(b) A peace officer described in subdivision (a) who completed the course in subdivision (a) and who leaves employment with a law enforcement agency and who does not become reemployed by a law enforcement agency within two years of their departure shall, if assigned to traffic enforcement, complete one of the following courses within one year of their assignment to traffic enforcement:(1) Any of the below commission-certified courses provided by the Department of the California Highway Patrol: Patrol or a local law enforcement agency:(A) Standardized field sobriety testing course.(B) National Highway Transportation Safety Administration-approved standard field sobriety testing refresher course.(B)(C) Drug recognition expert classroom course.(C)(D) Drug recognition expert recertification course.(D)(E) Advanced roadside impaired driving enforcement course.(2) Any other commission-certified, continuing professional training-eligible course relating to law enforcement detection and apprehension of drivers whose behavior indicates that they may be driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol in violation of Section 23152 of the Vehicle Code.(e) The commission shall implement this section on or before July 1, 2027.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.